Washington statutes.
RCW 8.20.130

Prosecution of work pending appeal—Bond.

The construction of any railway surface tramway, elevated cable tramway, or canal, or the prosecution of any works or improvements by any corporation as aforesaid shall not be hindered, delayed or prevented by the prosecution of the appeal of any party to the proceedings: PROVIDED, The corporation aforesaid shall execute and file with the clerk of the court in which the appeal is pending a bond to be approved by said clerk, with sufficient sureties, conditioned that the persons executing the same shall pay whatever amount may be required by the judgment of the court therein, and abide any rule or order of the court in relation to the matter in controversy.

[ 1897 c 46 s 2; 1890 p 300 s 10; RRS s 932. Prior: 1888 p 62 s 10.]